Illinois, session 104th, HB4578.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Sections 12C-5 and 12C-15 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/12C-5)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-21.6)7    Sec. 12C-5. Endangering the life or health of a child. 8    (a) A person commits endangering the life or health of a 9child when he or she knowingly: (1) causes or permits the life 10or health of a child under the age of 18 to be endangered; or 11(2) causes or permits a child to be placed in circumstances 12that endanger the child's life or health. It is not a violation 13of this Section for a person to relinquish a child in 14accordance with the Abandoned Newborn Infant Protection Act.15    (b) A trier of fact may infer that a child 6 years of age 16or younger is unattended if that child is left in a motor 17vehicle for more than 10 minutes.18    (c) "Unattended" means either: (i) not accompanied by a 19person 14 years of age or older; or (ii) if accompanied by a 20person 14 years of age or older, out of sight of that person.21    (d) Sentence. A violation of this Section is a Class A 22misdemeanor. A second or subsequent violation of this Section 23or a similar statute of this State or any other state of an   HB4578- 2 -LRB104 17777 RLC 31209 b1offense that is substantially equivalent to the offense of 2endangering the life or health of a child is a Class 3 felony. 3In addition to any other penalty provided by law, upon 4conviction for violating subsection (a) of this Section, the 5court may order the convicted person to undergo a 6psychological or psychiatric evaluation and to undergo any 7treatment at the convicted person's expense that the court 8determines to be appropriate after due consideration of the 9evaluation. A violation of this Section that is a proximate 10cause of the death of the child is a Class 3 felony for which a 11person, if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, shall be 12sentenced to a term of not less than 2 years and not more than 1310 years. A parent, who is found to be in violation of this 14Section with respect to his or her child, may be sentenced to 15probation for this offense pursuant to Section 12C-15. 16(Source: P.A. 97-1109, eff. 1-1-13.) 17    (720 ILCS 5/12C-15)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-22)18    Sec. 12C-15. Child abandonment or endangerment; probation. 19    (a) Whenever a parent of a child as determined by the court 20on the facts before it, pleads guilty to or is found guilty of, 21with respect to his or her child, child abandonment under 22Section 12C-10 of this Article or endangering the life or 23health of a child under Section 12C-5 of this Article, the 24court may, without entering a judgment of guilt and with the 25consent of the person, defer further proceedings and place the   HB4578- 3 -LRB104 17777 RLC 31209 b1person upon probation upon the reasonable terms and conditions 2as the court may require. At least one term of the probation 3shall require the person to cooperate with the Department of 4Children and Family Services at the times and in the programs 5that the Department of Children and Family Services may 6require.7    (b) Upon fulfillment of the terms and conditions imposed 8under subsection (a), the court shall discharge the person and 9dismiss the proceedings. Discharge and dismissal under this 10Section shall be without court adjudication of guilt and shall 11not be considered a conviction for purposes of 12disqualification or disabilities imposed by law upon 13conviction of a crime. However, a record of the disposition 14shall be reported by the clerk of the circuit court to the 15Illinois State Police under Section 2.1 of the Criminal 16Identification Act, and the record shall be maintained and 17provided to any civil authority in connection with a 18determination of whether the person is an acceptable candidate 19for the care, custody and supervision of children.20    (c) Discharge and dismissal under this Section may occur 21only once.22    (d) Probation under this Section may not be for a period of 23less than 2 years.24    (e) If the child dies of the injuries alleged, this 25Section shall be inapplicable.26    (f) This Section is inapplicable to a second or subsequent   HB4578- 4 -LRB104 17777 RLC 31209 b1violation of this Section or a similar statute of this State or 2any other state of an offense that is substantially equivalent 3to the offense of endangering the life or health of a child. 4(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 5    Section 10. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 6amended by changing Section 115-10 as follows: 7    (725 ILCS 5/115-10)  (from Ch. 38, par. 115-10)8    Sec. 115-10. Certain hearsay exceptions. 9    (a) In a prosecution for a physical or sexual act 10perpetrated upon or against a child or youth who is a victim of 11trafficking in persons, involuntary servitude, and related 12offenses under the age of 13, a person with an intellectual 13disability, a person with a cognitive impairment, or a person 14with a developmental disability, including, but not limited 15to, prosecutions for violations of Sections 11-1.20 through 1611-1.60 or 12-13 through 12-16 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or 17the Criminal Code of 2012 and prosecutions for violations of 18Sections 10-1 (kidnapping), 10-2 (aggravated kidnapping), 10-3 19(unlawful restraint), 10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint), 2010-4 (forcible detention), 10-5 (child abduction), 10-6 21(harboring a runaway), 10-7 (aiding or abetting child 22abduction), 10-9 (trafficking in persons, involuntary 23servitude, and related offenses), 11-9 (public indecency), 2411-11 (sexual relations within families), 11-21 (harmful   HB4578- 5 -LRB104 17777 RLC 31209 b1material), 12-1 (assault), 12-2 (aggravated assault), 12-3 2(battery), 12-3.2 (domestic battery), 12-3.3 (aggravated 3domestic battery), 12-3.05 or 12-4 (aggravated battery), 412-4.1 (heinous battery), 12-4.2 (aggravated battery with a 5firearm), 12-4.3 (aggravated battery of a child), 12-4.7 (drug 6induced infliction of great bodily harm), 12-5 (reckless 7conduct), 12-6 (intimidation), 12-6.1 or 12-6.5 (compelling 8organization membership of persons), 12-7.1 (hate crime), 912-7.3 (stalking), 12-7.4 (aggravated stalking), 12-10 or 1012C-35 (tattooing the body of a minor), 12-11 or 19-6 (home 11invasion), 12-21.5 or 12C-10 (child abandonment), 12-21.6 or 1212C-5 (endangering the life or health of a child) or 12-32 13(ritual mutilation) of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 14Criminal Code of 2012 or any sex offense as defined in 15subsection (B) of Section 2 of the Sex Offender Registration 16Act, the following evidence shall be admitted as an exception 17to the hearsay rule:18        (1) testimony by the victim or qualified witness of an 19    out of court statement made by that person the victim that 20    he or she complained of a qualified such act to another; 21    and22        (2) testimony of an out of court statement made by the 23    victim or qualified witness describing any complaint of 24    such act or matter or detail pertaining to any act which is 25    an element of an offense which is the subject of a 26    prosecution for a sexual or physical act against the that   HB4578- 6 -LRB104 17777 RLC 31209 b1    victim.2    (b) Such testimony shall only be admitted if:3        (1) The court finds in a hearing conducted outside the 4    presence of the jury that the time, content, and 5    circumstances of the statement provide sufficient 6    safeguards of reliability; and7        (2) The victim or qualified witness child or person 8    with an intellectual disability, a cognitive impairment, 9    or developmental disability either:10            (A) testifies at the proceeding; or11            (B) is unavailable as a witness and there is 12        corroborative evidence of the act which is the subject 13        of the statement; and14        (3) In a case in which the victim or qualified witness 15    is involving an offense perpetrated against a child under 16    the age of 18 13, where the out of court statement was made 17    before the victim attained 18 13 years of age or within 3 18    months after the commission of the offense, whichever 19    occurs later, such but the statement may be admitted 20    regardless of the age of the victim or qualified witness 21    at the time of the proceeding.22    (c) If a statement is admitted pursuant to this Section, 23the court shall instruct the jury that it is for the jury to 24determine the weight and credibility to be given the statement 25and that, in making the determination, it shall consider the 26age and maturity of the child, or the intellectual   HB4578- 7 -LRB104 17777 RLC 31209 b1capabilities of the person with an intellectual disability, a 2cognitive impairment, or developmental disability, the nature 3of the statement, the circumstances under which the statement 4was made, and any other relevant factor.5    (d) The proponent of the statement shall give the adverse 6party reasonable notice of his intention to offer the 7statement and the particulars of the statement.8    (e) Statements described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of 9subsection (a) shall not be excluded on the basis that they 10were obtained as a result of interviews conducted pursuant to 11a protocol adopted by a Child Advocacy Advisory Board as set 12forth in subsections (c), (d), and (e) of Section 3 of the 13Children's Advocacy Center Act or that an interviewer or 14witness to the interview was or is an employee, agent, or 15investigator of a State's Attorney's office.16    (f) For the purposes of this Section:17    "Child" means a person under 18 years of age.18    "Youth" means a victim of trafficking in persons, 19involuntary servitude, and related offenses.20    "Qualified act" means an act of the defendant, or one for 21whose conduct the defendant is legally responsible, deemed 22admissible by the court under Illinois Rules of Evidence 23404(b) or 413, or both, or under any of Sections 115-7.3, 24115-7.4, or 115-20 of this Code, or a combination of any of 25these Sections.26    "Qualified witness" means a witness who is a child under   HB4578- 8 -LRB104 17777 RLC 31209 b118 years of age, a person with an intellectual disability, a 2person with a cognitive impairment, or a person with a 3developmental disability. 4    "Person with a cognitive impairment" means a person with a 5significant impairment of cognition or memory that represents 6a marked deterioration from a previous level of function. 7Cognitive impairment includes, but is not limited to, 8dementia, amnesia, delirium, or a traumatic brain injury.9    "Person with a developmental disability" means a person 10with a disability that is attributable to (1) an intellectual 11disability, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, or autism, or (2) any 12other condition that results in an impairment similar to that 13caused by an intellectual disability and requires services 14similar to those required by a person with an intellectual 15disability.16    "Person with an intellectual disability" means a person 17with significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning 18which exists concurrently with an impairment in adaptive 19behavior.20(Source: P.A. 104-159, eff. 1-1-26.) 21    Section 15. The Bill of Rights for Children is amended by 22changing Section 3.5 as follows: 23    (725 ILCS 115/3.5)24    Sec. 3.5. Right to forensic interview with children's   HB4578- 9 -LRB104 17777 RLC 31209 b1advocacy center. Every child reported to the Department of 2Children and Family Services or law enforcement to be a victim 3of sexual assault or sexual abuse, a physical act, or youth who 4is a victim of trafficking in persons, involuntary servitude, 5and related offenses, whose case is accepted by either agency 6for investigation has the right to have that child's forensic 7interview conducted by a forensic interviewer from a 8children's advocacy center accredited according to the 9Children's Advocacy Center Act and serving the child's area or 10jurisdiction where the incident(s) occurred, when such service 11is accessible based on the CAC's available resources. Notice 12of the right to a forensic interview and the trauma-informed 13services provided by a children's advocacy center must be 14given by the investigative personnel and This right may be 15asserted by the child or the child's parent or guardian 16informing the investigating personnel at the Department of 17Children and Family Services or the law enforcement agency 18that the parent or guardian wants the child to have the child's 19interview conducted by the children's advocacy center. Each 20local CAC protocol will outline a process to address 21situations in which it is deemed not possible for a forensic 22interview to occur, to ensure a trauma-informed response with 23follow up services from the CAC. In this Section:24    "Child" or "children" means a person or persons under 18 25years of age.26    "Youth" means persons at least 18 years of age and under 24   HB4578- 10 -LRB104 17777 RLC 31209 b1years of age. 2(Source: P.A. 102-477, eff. 1-1-22.) 3    Section 20. The Privacy of Child Victims of Criminal 4Sexual Offenses Act is amended by changing Section 3 as 5follows: 6    (725 ILCS 190/3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1453)7    Sec. 3. Confidentiality of law enforcement and court 8records. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 9inspection and copying of law enforcement records maintained 10by any law enforcement agency or all circuit court records 11maintained by any circuit clerk relating to any investigation 12or proceeding pertaining to a criminal sexual offense, by any 13person, except a judge, state's attorney, assistant state's 14attorney, Attorney General, Assistant Attorney General, 15psychologist, psychiatrist, social worker, doctor, 16nonoffending parent or guardian, parole agent, aftercare 17specialist, probation officer, multidisciplinary team member 18(MDT) (as defined in the Children's Advocacy Center Act), 19defendant, defendant's attorney, advocate, or victim's 20attorney (as defined in Section 3 of the Rights of Crime 21Victims and Witnesses Act) in any criminal proceeding or 22investigation related thereto, shall be restricted to exclude 23the identity of any child who is a victim of such criminal 24sexual offense or alleged criminal sexual offense unless a   HB4578- 11 -LRB104 17777 RLC 31209 b1court order is issued authorizing the removal of such 2restriction as provided under this Section of a particular 3case record or particular records of cases maintained by any 4circuit court clerk. A court may, for the child's protection 5and for good cause shown, prohibit any person or agency 6present in court from further disclosing the child's identity.7    A court may prohibit such disclosure only after giving 8notice and a hearing to all affected parties. In determining 9whether to prohibit disclosure of the minor's identity, the 10court shall consider: 11        (1) the best interest of the child; and 12        (2) whether such nondisclosure would further a 13    compelling State interest. 14    When a criminal sexual offense is committed or alleged to 15have been committed by a school district employee or any 16individual contractually employed by a school district, a copy 17of the criminal history record information relating to the 18investigation of the offense or alleged offense shall be 19transmitted to the superintendent of schools of the district 20immediately upon request or if the law enforcement agency 21knows that a school district employee or any individual 22contractually employed by a school district has committed or 23is alleged to have committed a criminal sexual offense, the 24superintendent of schools of the district shall be immediately 25provided a copy of the criminal history record information. 26The copy of the criminal history record information to be   HB4578- 12 -LRB104 17777 RLC 31209 b1provided under this Section shall exclude the identity of the 2child victim. The superintendent shall be restricted from 3revealing the identity of the victim. Nothing in this Article 4precludes or may be used to preclude a mandated reporter from 5reporting child abuse or child neglect as required under the 6Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act.7    For the purposes of this Act, "criminal history record 8information" means:9        (i) chronologically maintained arrest information, 10    such as traditional arrest logs or blotters;11        (ii) the name of a person in the custody of a law 12    enforcement agency and the charges for which that person 13    is being held;14        (iii) court records that are public, as defined in 15    paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Section 5 of the Court 16    Record and Document Accessibility Act;17        (iv) records that are otherwise available under State 18    or local law; or19        (v) records in which the requesting party is the 20    individual identified, except as provided under part (vii) 21    of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of Section 7 of the 22    Freedom of Information Act. 23(Source: P.A. 102-651, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 24103-166, eff. 1-1-24.)  HB4578- 13 -LRB104 17777 RLC 31209 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    720 ILCS 5/12C-5was 720 ILCS 5/12-21.64    720 ILCS 5/12C-15was 720 ILCS 5/12-225    725 ILCS 5/115-10from Ch. 38, par. 115-106    725 ILCS 115/3.57    725 ILCS 190/3from Ch. 38, par. 1453